Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [174.065] CONSOLIDATED LOCAL TRANSPORTATION FINANCIALS REPORT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Funding source" means the relevant tax or revenue source for which financial reporting information is required. new text end new text begin (c) "Reporting unit" means a county, regional railroad authority, or other political subdivision that is specifically required to submit financial information under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consolidated report. new text end new text begin (a) By March 1 annually, the commissioner must submit a report on consolidated local transportation financials to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance and policy. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the information specified under subdivision 3 for each funding source as required under sections 174.49, subdivision 7; 297A.993, subdivision 2a; and 398A.04, subdivision 12; new text end new text begin (2) subtotals for each reporting unit that is required to submit financial information under this section; and new text end new text begin (3) totals for all reporting units. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may establish submission requirements for the financial information, which may include but is not limited to a submission deadline and a format for the fiscal details. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required financial information. new text end new text begin (a) At a minimum, each reporting unit must submit financial information on the funding source that includes: new text end new text begin (1) actual allocations or collections to the reporting unit for each of the previous five calendar years; new text end new text begin (2) balance actuals for each of the previous five calendar years; new text end new text begin (3) estimates of the amount that is expected to be allocated to or collected by the reporting unit in the current year and for the next ten calendar years; and new text end new text begin (4) for each of the previous five calendar years, the current calendar year, and for the next ten calendar years: new text end new text begin (i) the amount expended or proposed to be expended for each of the following, as applicable: new text end new text begin (A) planning, project development, construction, operation, or maintenance of guideways, as defined in section 473.4485, subdivision 1, paragraph (d); new text end new text begin (B) nonguideway transit uses; new text end new text begin (C) active transportation uses; new text end new text begin (D) highway uses; and new text end new text begin (E) uses not otherwise specified in subitems (A) to (D); new text end new text begin (ii) for each category under item (i), subitems (A) to (D), an accompanying list of completed, current, planned, and anticipated projects; and new text end new text begin (iii) an estimated balance of unspent or undesignated amounts from the funding source. new text end new text begin (b) The listing under paragraph (a), clause (4), item (ii), must include a brief identification or description of each project or program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Aid withholding. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually withhold payment of 25 percent of the amount apportioned under section 162.07 for a county that (1) is a reporting unit, and (2) fails to meet financial information submission requirements established by the commissioner under subdivision 2, paragraph (c). The commissioner may release withheld funds no sooner than 30 days following acceptance of a submission. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exceptions. This section does not apply to: (1) a law that establishes a requirement with general applicability for an agency or agencies to submit a report, including but not limited to reports and information under sections 14.05, subdivision 5, and 14.116; (2) a law that specifies a reporting expiration date or a date for the submission of a final report; (3) information required by law to be included in a budget submission to the legislature under section 16A.11; (4) the plans required under section 174.03, subdivisions 1a, 1b, and 1c; (5) the forecast information requirements under section 174.03, subdivision 9; and (6) the reports required under sections 161.088, subdivision 7; 161.089; 161.3203, subdivision 4; 165.03, subdivision 8; 174.03, subdivision 12;new text begin 174.065;new text end 174.185, subdivision 3; 174.247; 174.56, subdivisions 1 and 2; and 174.75, subdivision 3. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.49, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Metropolitan counties; financial information. new text end new text begin (a) A metropolitan county must annually submit financial information to the commissioner on all sources of funds that are subject to the requirements under subdivision 6. The financial information must be submitted as provided under section 174.065 in the manner and by the dates prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the requirements under section 174.065, subdivision 3, the submitted financial information must include the amount expended or proposed to be expended in each of the allowable uses under subdivision 6 for: new text end new text begin (1) each of the previous five calendar years; new text end new text begin (2) the current calendar year; and new text end new text begin (3) the next ten calendar years. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.993, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Uses reporting. deleted text begin By February 15 of each even-numbered year,deleted text end A metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, that imposes the taxes under this section mustnew text begin annuallynew text end submit deleted text begin a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and financedeleted text end new text begin financial information to the commissioner of transportation as provided under section 174.065 in the manner and by the dates prescribed by the commissionernew text end . deleted text begin At a minimum, the report must include: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) actual transportation sales tax collections by the county over the previous five calendar years; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) an estimation of the total sales tax revenue that is estimated to be collected by the county in the current year and for the next ten calendar years; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) for each of the previous five calendar years, the current calendar year, and for the next ten calendar years: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) the amount of sales tax revenue expended or proposed to be expended for each of the following: deleted text end deleted text begin (A) planning, construction, operation, or maintenance of guideways, as defined in section 473.4485, subdivision 1, paragraph (d); deleted text end deleted text begin (B) nonguideway transit and active transportation uses; deleted text end deleted text begin (C) highway uses; and deleted text end deleted text begin (D) uses not otherwise specified in subitems (A) to (C); deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) completed, current, planned, and eligible projects for each category under item (i); and deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) an estimated balance of unspent or undesignated county sales tax revenue. deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 398A.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Financial information. new text end new text begin An authority associated with a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, must annually submit financial information to the commissioner of transportation as provided under section 174.065 in the manner and by the dates prescribed by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.4465, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Use of funds; metropolitan countiesdeleted text begin ; reportingdeleted text end . deleted text begin (a)deleted text end A metropolitan county must use revenue from the regional transportation sales and use tax under section 297A.9915 in conformance with the requirements under section 174.49, subdivision 6. deleted text begin (b) By February 15 of each even-numbered year, a metropolitan county must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance on the use of funds received under section 297A.9915. This report must be submitted in conjunction with the report required under section 297A.993, subdivision 2a. At a minimum, the report must include: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) actual sales tax collections allocated to the county over the previous five calendar years; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) an estimation of the total sales tax revenue that is estimated to be allocated to the county in the current year and for the next ten calendar years; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) for each of the previous five calendar years, the current calendar year, and for the next ten calendar years: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) the amount of sales tax revenue expended or proposed to be expended for each of the allowable uses under section 174.49, subdivision 6; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) completed, current, planned, and eligible projects or programs for each category under item (i); and deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) an estimated balance of unspent or undesignated regional transportation sales and use tax revenue. deleted text end